Illinois, session 104th, HB3561.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The State Employees Group Insurance Act of 1971 5is amended by changing Section 6.11 as follows: 6    (5 ILCS 375/6.11)7    Sec. 6.11. Required health benefits; Illinois Insurance 8Code requirements. The program of health benefits shall 9provide the post-mastectomy care benefits required to be 10covered by a policy of accident and health insurance under 11Section 356t of the Illinois Insurance Code. The program of 12health benefits shall provide the coverage required under 13Sections 356g, 356g.5, 356g.5-1, 356m, 356q, 356u, 356u.10, 14356w, 356x, 356z.2, 356z.4, 356z.4a, 356z.5, 356z.6, 356z.8, 15356z.9, 356z.10, 356z.11, 356z.12, 356z.13, 356z.14, 356z.15, 16356z.17, 356z.22, 356z.25, 356z.26, 356z.29, 356z.30, 356z.32, 17356z.33, 356z.36, 356z.40, 356z.41, 356z.45, 356z.46, 356z.47, 18356z.51, 356z.53, 356z.54, 356z.55, 356z.56, 356z.57, 356z.59, 19356z.60, 356z.61, 356z.62, 356z.64, 356z.67, 356z.68, and 20356z.70, and 356z.71, 356z.74, 356z.76, 356z.77, and 356z.80 21of the Illinois Insurance Code. The program of health benefits 22must comply with Sections 155.22a, 155.37, 355b, 356z.19, 23370c, and 370c.1 and Article XXXIIB of the Illinois Insurance   HB3561- 2 -LRB104 10745 BAB 20824 b1Code. The program of health benefits shall provide the 2coverage required under Section 356m of the Illinois Insurance 3Code and, for the employees of the State Employee Group 4Insurance Program only, the coverage as also provided in 5Section 6.11B of this Act. The Department of Insurance shall 6enforce the requirements of this Section with respect to 7Sections 370c and 370c.1 of the Illinois Insurance Code; all 8other requirements of this Section shall be enforced by the 9Department of Central Management Services.10    Rulemaking authority to implement Public Act 95-1045, if 11any, is conditioned on the rules being adopted in accordance 12with all provisions of the Illinois Administrative Procedure 13Act and all rules and procedures of the Joint Committee on 14Administrative Rules; any purported rule not so adopted, for 15whatever reason, is unauthorized. 16(Source: P.A. 102-30, eff. 1-1-22; 102-103, eff. 1-1-22; 17102-203, eff. 1-1-22; 102-306, eff. 1-1-22; 102-642, eff. 181-1-22; 102-665, eff. 10-8-21; 102-731, eff. 1-1-23; 102-768, 19eff. 1-1-24; 102-804, eff. 1-1-23; 102-813, eff. 5-13-22; 20102-816, eff. 1-1-23; 102-860, eff. 1-1-23; 102-1093, eff. 211-1-23; 102-1117, eff. 1-13-23; 103-8, eff. 1-1-24; 103-84, 22eff. 1-1-24; 103-91, eff. 1-1-24; 103-420, eff. 1-1-24; 23103-445, eff. 1-1-24; 103-535, eff. 8-11-23; 103-551, eff. 248-11-23; 103-605, eff. 7-1-24; 103-718, eff. 7-19-24; 103-751, 25eff. 8-2-24; 103-870, eff. 1-1-25; 103-914, eff. 1-1-25; 26103-918, eff. 1-1-25; 103-951, eff. 1-1-25; 103-1024, eff.   HB3561- 3 -LRB104 10745 BAB 20824 b11-1-25; revised 11-26-24.) 2    Section 10. The Counties Code is amended by changing 3Section 5-1069.3 as follows: 4    (55 ILCS 5/5-1069.3)5    Sec. 5-1069.3. Required health benefits. If a county, 6including a home rule county, is a self-insurer for purposes 7of providing health insurance coverage for its employees, the 8coverage shall include coverage for the post-mastectomy care 9benefits required to be covered by a policy of accident and 10health insurance under Section 356t and the coverage required 11under Sections 356g, 356g.5, 356g.5-1, 356m, 356q, 356u, 12356u.10, 356w, 356x, 356z.4, 356z.4a, 356z.6, 356z.8, 356z.9, 13356z.10, 356z.11, 356z.12, 356z.13, 356z.14, 356z.15, 356z.22, 14356z.25, 356z.26, 356z.29, 356z.30, 356z.32, 356z.33, 356z.36, 15356z.40, 356z.41, 356z.45, 356z.46, 356z.47, 356z.48, 356z.51, 16356z.53, 356z.54, 356z.56, 356z.57, 356z.59, 356z.60, 356z.61, 17356z.62, 356z.64, 356z.67, 356z.68, and 356z.70, and 356z.71, 18356z.74, 356z.77, and 356z.80 of the Illinois Insurance Code. 19The coverage shall comply with Sections 155.22a, 355b, 20356z.19, and 370c of the Illinois Insurance Code. The 21Department of Insurance shall enforce the requirements of this 22Section. The requirement that health benefits be covered as 23provided in this Section is an exclusive power and function of 24the State and is a denial and limitation under Article VII,   HB3561- 4 -LRB104 10745 BAB 20824 b1Section 6, subsection (h) of the Illinois Constitution. A home 2rule county to which this Section applies must comply with 3every provision of this Section. 4    Rulemaking authority to implement Public Act 95-1045, if 5any, is conditioned on the rules being adopted in accordance 6with all provisions of the Illinois Administrative Procedure 7Act and all rules and procedures of the Joint Committee on 8Administrative Rules; any purported rule not so adopted, for 9whatever reason, is unauthorized. 10(Source: P.A. 102-30, eff. 1-1-22; 102-103, eff. 1-1-22; 11102-203, eff. 1-1-22; 102-306, eff. 1-1-22; 102-443, eff. 121-1-22; 102-642, eff. 1-1-22; 102-665, eff. 10-8-21; 102-731, 13eff. 1-1-23; 102-804, eff. 1-1-23; 102-813, eff. 5-13-22; 14102-816, eff. 1-1-23; 102-860, eff. 1-1-23; 102-1093, eff. 151-1-23; 102-1117, eff. 1-13-23; 103-84, eff. 1-1-24; 103-91, 16eff. 1-1-24; 103-420, eff. 1-1-24; 103-445, eff. 1-1-24; 17103-535, eff. 8-11-23; 103-551, eff. 8-11-23; 103-605, eff. 187-1-24; 103-718, eff. 7-19-24; 103-751, eff. 8-2-24; 103-914, 19eff. 1-1-25; 103-918, eff. 1-1-25; 103-1024, eff. 1-1-25; 20revised 11-26-24.) 21    Section 15. The Illinois Municipal Code is amended by 22changing Section 10-4-2.3 as follows: 23    (65 ILCS 5/10-4-2.3)24    Sec. 10-4-2.3. Required health benefits. If a   HB3561- 5 -LRB104 10745 BAB 20824 b1municipality, including a home rule municipality, is a 2self-insurer for purposes of providing health insurance 3coverage for its employees, the coverage shall include 4coverage for the post-mastectomy care benefits required to be 5covered by a policy of accident and health insurance under 6Section 356t and the coverage required under Sections 356g, 7356g.5, 356g.5-1, 356m, 356q, 356u, 356u.10, 356w, 356x, 8356z.4, 356z.4a, 356z.6, 356z.8, 356z.9, 356z.10, 356z.11, 9356z.12, 356z.13, 356z.14, 356z.15, 356z.22, 356z.25, 356z.26, 10356z.29, 356z.30, 356z.32, 356z.33, 356z.36, 356z.40, 356z.41, 11356z.45, 356z.46, 356z.47, 356z.48, 356z.51, 356z.53, 356z.54, 12356z.56, 356z.57, 356z.59, 356z.60, 356z.61, 356z.62, 356z.64, 13356z.67, 356z.68, and 356z.70, and 356z.71, 356z.74, 356z.77, 14and 356z.80 of the Illinois Insurance Code. The coverage shall 15comply with Sections 155.22a, 355b, 356z.19, and 370c of the 16Illinois Insurance Code. The Department of Insurance shall 17enforce the requirements of this Section. The requirement that 18health benefits be covered as provided in this is an exclusive 19power and function of the State and is a denial and limitation 20under Article VII, Section 6, subsection (h) of the Illinois 21Constitution. A home rule municipality to which this Section 22applies must comply with every provision of this Section. 23    Rulemaking authority to implement Public Act 95-1045, if 24any, is conditioned on the rules being adopted in accordance 25with all provisions of the Illinois Administrative Procedure 26Act and all rules and procedures of the Joint Committee on   HB3561- 6 -LRB104 10745 BAB 20824 b1Administrative Rules; any purported rule not so adopted, for 2whatever reason, is unauthorized. 3(Source: P.A. 102-30, eff. 1-1-22; 102-103, eff. 1-1-22; 4102-203, eff. 1-1-22; 102-306, eff. 1-1-22; 102-443, eff. 51-1-22; 102-642, eff. 1-1-22; 102-665, eff. 10-8-21; 102-731, 6eff. 1-1-23; 102-804, eff. 1-1-23; 102-813, eff. 5-13-22; 7102-816, eff. 1-1-23; 102-860, eff. 1-1-23; 102-1093, eff. 81-1-23; 102-1117, eff. 1-13-23; 103-84, eff. 1-1-24; 103-91, 9eff. 1-1-24; 103-420, eff. 1-1-24; 103-445, eff. 1-1-24; 10103-535, eff. 8-11-23; 103-551, eff. 8-11-23; 103-605, eff. 117-1-24; 103-718, eff. 7-19-24; 103-751, eff. 8-2-24; 103-914, 12eff. 1-1-25; 103-918, eff. 1-1-25; 103-1024, eff. 1-1-25; 13revised 11-26-24.) 14    Section 20. The School Code is amended by changing Section 1510-22.3f as follows: 16    (105 ILCS 5/10-22.3f)17    Sec. 10-22.3f. Required health benefits. Insurance 18protection and benefits for employees shall provide the 19post-mastectomy care benefits required to be covered by a 20policy of accident and health insurance under Section 356t and 21the coverage required under Sections 356g, 356g.5, 356g.5-1, 22356m, 356q, 356u, 356u.10, 356w, 356x, 356z.4, 356z.4a, 23356z.6, 356z.8, 356z.9, 356z.11, 356z.12, 356z.13, 356z.14, 24356z.15, 356z.22, 356z.25, 356z.26, 356z.29, 356z.30, 356z.32,   HB3561- 7 -LRB104 10745 BAB 20824 b1356z.33, 356z.36, 356z.40, 356z.41, 356z.45, 356z.46, 356z.47, 2356z.51, 356z.53, 356z.54, 356z.56, 356z.57, 356z.59, 356z.60, 3356z.61, 356z.62, 356z.64, 356z.67, 356z.68, and 356z.70, and 4356z.71, 356z.74, 356z.77, and 356z.80 of the Illinois 5Insurance Code. Insurance policies shall comply with Section 6356z.19 of the Illinois Insurance Code. The coverage shall 7comply with Sections 155.22a, 355b, and 370c of the Illinois 8Insurance Code. The Department of Insurance shall enforce the 9requirements of this Section. 10    Rulemaking authority to implement Public Act 95-1045, if 11any, is conditioned on the rules being adopted in accordance 12with all provisions of the Illinois Administrative Procedure 13Act and all rules and procedures of the Joint Committee on 14Administrative Rules; any purported rule not so adopted, for 15whatever reason, is unauthorized. 16(Source: P.A. 102-30, eff. 1-1-22; 102-103, eff. 1-1-22; 17102-203, eff. 1-1-22; 102-306, eff. 1-1-22; 102-642, eff. 181-1-22; 102-665, eff. 10-8-21; 102-731, eff. 1-1-23; 102-804, 19eff. 1-1-23; 102-813, eff. 5-13-22; 102-816, eff. 1-1-23; 20102-860, eff. 1-1-23; 102-1093, eff. 1-1-23; 102-1117, eff. 211-13-23; 103-84, eff. 1-1-24; 103-91, eff. 1-1-24; 103-420, 22eff. 1-1-24; 103-445, eff. 1-1-24; 103-535, eff. 8-11-23; 23103-551, eff. 8-11-23; 103-605, eff. 7-1-24; 103-718, eff. 247-19-24; 103-751, eff. 8-2-24; 103-914, eff. 1-1-25; 103-918, 25eff. 1-1-25; 103-1024, eff. 1-1-25; revised 11-26-24.)   HB3561- 8 -LRB104 10745 BAB 20824 b1    Section 22. The Illinois Insurance Code is amended by 2adding Section 356z.80 as follows: 3    (5 ILCS 375/356z.80 new)4    Sec. 356z.80. Coverage for allergenic protein dietary 5supplements.6    (a) As used in this Section:7    "Dietary supplement" has the meaning given to that term in 8the Federal Food, Drug, and Cosmetic Act, 21 U.S.C. 321.9    "Early egg allergen introduction dietary supplement" means 10a dietary supplement that is prescribed to an infant by a 11health care provider and contains sufficient infant-safe, 12well-cooked egg protein to reduce the risk of food allergies.13    "Early peanut allergen introduction dietary supplement" 14means a dietary supplement that is prescribed to an infant by a 15health care provider and contains sufficient infant-safe 16peanut protein to reduce the risk of food allergies.17    "Health care provider" or "provider" means a physician, 18hospital facility, or other health care practitioner licensed, 19accredited, or certified to perform specified health care 20services consistent with State law, responsible for 21recommending health care services on behalf of a covered 22person.23    "Infant" means a child who has not attained the age of one 24year.25    (b) A group or individual policy of accident and health   HB3561- 9 -LRB104 10745 BAB 20824 b1insurance or a managed care plan that is amended, delivered, 2issued, or renewed on or after January 1, 2027 shall provide 3coverage for at least one early egg allergen introduction 4dietary supplement and at least one early peanut allergen 5introduction dietary supplement.6    The coverage required under this subsection shall be 7provided at no cost to a covered individual, including 8deductible payments and cost-sharing amounts charged once a 9deductible is met.10    (c) Except as provided under subsection (b) of this 11Section, nothing in this Section prevents the operation of a 12policy provision required by this Section as a deductible, 13coinsurance, allowable charge limitation, coordination of 14benefits, or a provision restricting coverage to services by a 15licensed, certified, or carrier-approved provider or facility.16    (d) This Section does not apply to accident-only, 17specified disease, hospital indemnity, Medicare supplement, 18long-term care, disability income, or other limited benefit 19health insurance policies.20    (e) The cost-sharing limitation under subsection (b) does 21not apply to:22        (1) a catastrophic health plan to the extent this 23    cost-sharing limitation would cause the plan to fail to be 24    treated as a catastrophic plan under 42 U.S.C. 18022(e).25        (2) a high deductible health plan to the extent this 26    cost-sharing limitation would cause the plan to fail to be   HB3561- 10 -LRB104 10745 BAB 20824 b1    treated as a high deductible health plan under Section 2    223(c)(2) of the Internal Revenue Code. 3    If the cost-sharing limitation under subsection (b) would 4result in an enrollee becoming ineligible for a health savings 5account under federal law, this cost-sharing limitation only 6applies to a qualified high deductible health plan after the 7enrollee's deductible has been met.  8    Section 25. The Health Maintenance Organization Act is 9amended by changing Section 5-3 as follows: 10    (215 ILCS 125/5-3)  (from Ch. 111 1/2, par. 1411.2)11    (Text of Section before amendment by P.A. 103-808)12    Sec. 5-3. Insurance Code provisions. 13    (a) Health Maintenance Organizations shall be subject to 14the provisions of Sections 133, 134, 136, 137, 139, 140, 15141.1, 141.2, 141.3, 143, 143.31, 143c, 147, 148, 149, 151, 16152, 153, 154, 154.5, 154.6, 154.7, 154.8, 155.04, 155.22a, 17155.49, 352c, 355.2, 355.3, 355.6, 355b, 355c, 356f, 356g.5-1, 18356m, 356q, 356u.10, 356v, 356w, 356x, 356z.2, 356z.3a, 19356z.4, 356z.4a, 356z.5, 356z.6, 356z.8, 356z.9, 356z.10, 20356z.11, 356z.12, 356z.13, 356z.14, 356z.15, 356z.17, 356z.18, 21356z.19, 356z.20, 356z.21, 356z.22, 356z.23, 356z.24, 356z.25, 22356z.26, 356z.28, 356z.29, 356z.30, 356z.31, 356z.32, 356z.33, 23356z.34, 356z.35, 356z.36, 356z.37, 356z.38, 356z.39, 356z.40, 24356z.40a, 356z.41, 356z.44, 356z.45, 356z.46, 356z.47,   HB3561- 11 -LRB104 10745 BAB 20824 b1356z.48, 356z.49, 356z.50, 356z.51, 356z.53, 356z.54, 356z.55, 2356z.56, 356z.57, 356z.58, 356z.59, 356z.60, 356z.61, 356z.62, 3356z.63, 356z.64, 356z.65, 356z.66, 356z.67, 356z.68, 356z.69, 4356z.70, 356z.71, 356z.72, 356z.73, 356z.74, 356z.75, 356z.77, 5356z.80, 364, 364.01, 364.3, 367.2, 367.2-5, 367i, 368a, 368b, 6368c, 368d, 368e, 370c, 370c.1, 401, 401.1, 402, 403, 403A, 7408, 408.2, 409, 412, 444, and 444.1, paragraph (c) of 8subsection (2) of Section 367, and Articles IIA, VIII 1/2, 9XII, XII 1/2, XIII, XIII 1/2, XXV, XXVI, and XXXIIB of the 10Illinois Insurance Code.11    (b) For purposes of the Illinois Insurance Code, except 12for Sections 444 and 444.1 and Articles XIII and XIII 1/2, 13Health Maintenance Organizations in the following categories 14are deemed to be "domestic companies":15        (1) a corporation authorized under the Dental Service 16    Plan Act or the Voluntary Health Services Plans Act;17        (2) a corporation organized under the laws of this 18    State; or19        (3) a corporation organized under the laws of another 20    state, 30% or more of the enrollees of which are residents 21    of this State, except a corporation subject to 22    substantially the same requirements in its state of 23    organization as is a "domestic company" under Article VIII 24    1/2 of the Illinois Insurance Code.25    (c) In considering the merger, consolidation, or other 26acquisition of control of a Health Maintenance Organization   HB3561- 12 -LRB104 10745 BAB 20824 b1pursuant to Article VIII 1/2 of the Illinois Insurance Code,2        (1) the Director shall give primary consideration to 3    the continuation of benefits to enrollees and the 4    financial conditions of the acquired Health Maintenance 5    Organization after the merger, consolidation, or other 6    acquisition of control takes effect;7        (2)(i) the criteria specified in subsection (1)(b) of 8    Section 131.8 of the Illinois Insurance Code shall not 9    apply and (ii) the Director, in making his determination 10    with respect to the merger, consolidation, or other 11    acquisition of control, need not take into account the 12    effect on competition of the merger, consolidation, or 13    other acquisition of control;14        (3) the Director shall have the power to require the 15    following information:16            (A) certification by an independent actuary of the 17        adequacy of the reserves of the Health Maintenance 18        Organization sought to be acquired;19            (B) pro forma financial statements reflecting the 20        combined balance sheets of the acquiring company and 21        the Health Maintenance Organization sought to be 22        acquired as of the end of the preceding year and as of 23        a date 90 days prior to the acquisition, as well as pro 24        forma financial statements reflecting projected 25        combined operation for a period of 2 years;26            (C) a pro forma business plan detailing an   HB3561- 13 -LRB104 10745 BAB 20824 b1        acquiring party's plans with respect to the operation 2        of the Health Maintenance Organization sought to be 3        acquired for a period of not less than 3 years; and4            (D) such other information as the Director shall 5        require.6    (d) The provisions of Article VIII 1/2 of the Illinois 7Insurance Code and this Section 5-3 shall apply to the sale by 8any health maintenance organization of greater than 10% of its 9enrollee population (including, without limitation, the health 10maintenance organization's right, title, and interest in and 11to its health care certificates).12    (e) In considering any management contract or service 13agreement subject to Section 141.1 of the Illinois Insurance 14Code, the Director (i) shall, in addition to the criteria 15specified in Section 141.2 of the Illinois Insurance Code, 16take into account the effect of the management contract or 17service agreement on the continuation of benefits to enrollees 18and the financial condition of the health maintenance 19organization to be managed or serviced, and (ii) need not take 20into account the effect of the management contract or service 21agreement on competition.22    (f) Except for small employer groups as defined in the 23Small Employer Rating, Renewability and Portability Health 24Insurance Act and except for medicare supplement policies as 25defined in Section 363 of the Illinois Insurance Code, a 26Health Maintenance Organization may by contract agree with a   HB3561- 14 -LRB104 10745 BAB 20824 b1group or other enrollment unit to effect refunds or charge 2additional premiums under the following terms and conditions:3        (i) the amount of, and other terms and conditions with 4    respect to, the refund or additional premium are set forth 5    in the group or enrollment unit contract agreed in advance 6    of the period for which a refund is to be paid or 7    additional premium is to be charged (which period shall 8    not be less than one year); and9        (ii) the amount of the refund or additional premium 10    shall not exceed 20% of the Health Maintenance 11    Organization's profitable or unprofitable experience with 12    respect to the group or other enrollment unit for the 13    period (and, for purposes of a refund or additional 14    premium, the profitable or unprofitable experience shall 15    be calculated taking into account a pro rata share of the 16    Health Maintenance Organization's administrative and 17    marketing expenses, but shall not include any refund to be 18    made or additional premium to be paid pursuant to this 19    subsection (f)). The Health Maintenance Organization and 20    the group or enrollment unit may agree that the profitable 21    or unprofitable experience may be calculated taking into 22    account the refund period and the immediately preceding 2 23    plan years.24    The Health Maintenance Organization shall include a 25statement in the evidence of coverage issued to each enrollee 26describing the possibility of a refund or additional premium,   HB3561- 15 -LRB104 10745 BAB 20824 b1and upon request of any group or enrollment unit, provide to 2the group or enrollment unit a description of the method used 3to calculate (1) the Health Maintenance Organization's 4profitable experience with respect to the group or enrollment 5unit and the resulting refund to the group or enrollment unit 6or (2) the Health Maintenance Organization's unprofitable 7experience with respect to the group or enrollment unit and 8the resulting additional premium to be paid by the group or 9enrollment unit.10    In no event shall the Illinois Health Maintenance 11Organization Guaranty Association be liable to pay any 12contractual obligation of an insolvent organization to pay any 13refund authorized under this Section.14    (g) Rulemaking authority to implement Public Act 95-1045, 15if any, is conditioned on the rules being adopted in 16accordance with all provisions of the Illinois Administrative 17Procedure Act and all rules and procedures of the Joint 18Committee on Administrative Rules; any purported rule not so 19adopted, for whatever reason, is unauthorized. 20(Source: P.A. 102-30, eff. 1-1-22; 102-34, eff. 6-25-21; 21102-203, eff. 1-1-22; 102-306, eff. 1-1-22; 102-443, eff. 221-1-22; 102-589, eff. 1-1-22; 102-642, eff. 1-1-22; 102-665, 23eff. 10-8-21; 102-731, eff. 1-1-23; 102-775, eff. 5-13-22; 24102-804, eff. 1-1-23; 102-813, eff. 5-13-22; 102-816, eff. 251-1-23; 102-860, eff. 1-1-23; 102-901, eff. 7-1-22; 102-1093, 26eff. 1-1-23; 102-1117, eff. 1-13-23; 103-84, eff. 1-1-24;   HB3561- 16 -LRB104 10745 BAB 20824 b1103-91, eff. 1-1-24; 103-123, eff. 1-1-24; 103-154, eff. 26-30-23; 103-420, eff. 1-1-24; 103-426, eff. 8-4-23; 103-445, 3eff. 1-1-24; 103-551, eff. 8-11-23; 103-605, eff. 7-1-24; 4103-618, eff. 1-1-25; 103-649, eff. 1-1-25; 103-656, eff. 51-1-25; 103-700, eff. 1-1-25; 103-718, eff. 7-19-24; 103-751, 6eff. 8-2-24; 103-753, eff. 8-2-24; 103-758, eff. 1-1-25; 7103-777, eff. 8-2-24; 103-914, eff. 1-1-25; 103-918, eff. 81-1-25; 103-1024, eff. 1-1-25; revised 9-26-24.) 9    (Text of Section after amendment by P.A. 103-808)10    Sec. 5-3. Insurance Code provisions. 11    (a) Health Maintenance Organizations shall be subject to 12the provisions of Sections 133, 134, 136, 137, 139, 140, 13141.1, 141.2, 141.3, 143, 143.31, 143c, 147, 148, 149, 151, 14152, 153, 154, 154.5, 154.6, 154.7, 154.8, 155.04, 155.22a, 15155.49, 352c, 355.2, 355.3, 355.6, 355b, 355c, 356f, 356g, 16356g.5-1, 356m, 356q, 356u.10, 356v, 356w, 356x, 356z.2, 17356z.3a, 356z.4, 356z.4a, 356z.5, 356z.6, 356z.8, 356z.9, 18356z.10, 356z.11, 356z.12, 356z.13, 356z.14, 356z.15, 356z.17, 19356z.18, 356z.19, 356z.20, 356z.21, 356z.22, 356z.23, 356z.24, 20356z.25, 356z.26, 356z.28, 356z.29, 356z.30, 356z.31, 356z.32, 21356z.33, 356z.34, 356z.35, 356z.36, 356z.37, 356z.38, 356z.39, 22356z.40, 356z.40a, 356z.41, 356z.44, 356z.45, 356z.46, 23356z.47, 356z.48, 356z.49, 356z.50, 356z.51, 356z.53, 356z.54, 24356z.55, 356z.56, 356z.57, 356z.58, 356z.59, 356z.60, 356z.61, 25356z.62, 356z.63, 356z.64, 356z.65, 356z.66, 356z.67, 356z.68,   HB3561- 17 -LRB104 10745 BAB 20824 b1356z.69, 356z.70, 356z.71, 356z.72, 356z.73, 356z.74, 356z.75, 2356z.77, 356z.80, 364, 364.01, 364.3, 367.2, 367.2-5, 367i, 3368a, 368b, 368c, 368d, 368e, 370c, 370c.1, 401, 401.1, 402, 4403, 403A, 408, 408.2, 409, 412, 444, and 444.1, paragraph (c) 5of subsection (2) of Section 367, and Articles IIA, VIII 1/2, 6XII, XII 1/2, XIII, XIII 1/2, XXV, XXVI, and XXXIIB of the 7Illinois Insurance Code.8    (b) For purposes of the Illinois Insurance Code, except 9for Sections 444 and 444.1 and Articles XIII and XIII 1/2, 10Health Maintenance Organizations in the following categories 11are deemed to be "domestic companies":12        (1) a corporation authorized under the Dental Service 13    Plan Act or the Voluntary Health Services Plans Act;14        (2) a corporation organized under the laws of this 15    State; or16        (3) a corporation organized under the laws of another 17    state, 30% or more of the enrollees of which are residents 18    of this State, except a corporation subject to 19    substantially the same requirements in its state of 20    organization as is a "domestic company" under Article VIII 21    1/2 of the Illinois Insurance Code.22    (c) In considering the merger, consolidation, or other 23acquisition of control of a Health Maintenance Organization 24pursuant to Article VIII 1/2 of the Illinois Insurance Code,25        (1) the Director shall give primary consideration to 26    the continuation of benefits to enrollees and the   HB3561- 18 -LRB104 10745 BAB 20824 b1    financial conditions of the acquired Health Maintenance 2    Organization after the merger, consolidation, or other 3    acquisition of control takes effect;4        (2)(i) the criteria specified in subsection (1)(b) of 5    Section 131.8 of the Illinois Insurance Code shall not 6    apply and (ii) the Director, in making his determination 7    with respect to the merger, consolidation, or other 8    acquisition of control, need not take into account the 9    effect on competition of the merger, consolidation, or 10    other acquisition of control;11        (3) the Director shall have the power to require the 12    following information:13            (A) certification by an independent actuary of the 14        adequacy of the reserves of the Health Maintenance 15        Organization sought to be acquired;16            (B) pro forma financial statements reflecting the 17        combined balance sheets of the acquiring company and 18        the Health Maintenance Organization sought to be 19        acquired as of the end of the preceding year and as of 20        a date 90 days prior to the acquisition, as well as pro 21        forma financial statements reflecting projected 22        combined operation for a period of 2 years;23            (C) a pro forma business plan detailing an 24        acquiring party's plans with respect to the operation 25        of the Health Maintenance Organization sought to be 26        acquired for a period of not less than 3 years; and  HB3561- 19 -LRB104 10745 BAB 20824 b1            (D) such other information as the Director shall 2        require.3    (d) The provisions of Article VIII 1/2 of the Illinois 4Insurance Code and this Section 5-3 shall apply to the sale by 5any health maintenance organization of greater than 10% of its 6enrollee population (including, without limitation, the health 7maintenance organization's right, title, and interest in and 8to its health care certificates).9    (e) In considering any management contract or service 10agreement subject to Section 141.1 of the Illinois Insurance 11Code, the Director (i) shall, in addition to the criteria 12specified in Section 141.2 of the Illinois Insurance Code, 13take into account the effect of the management contract or 14service agreement on the continuation of benefits to enrollees 15and the financial condition of the health maintenance 16organization to be managed or serviced, and (ii) need not take 17into account the effect of the management contract or service 18agreement on competition.19    (f) Except for small employer groups as defined in the 20Small Employer Rating, Renewability and Portability Health 21Insurance Act and except for medicare supplement policies as 22defined in Section 363 of the Illinois Insurance Code, a 23Health Maintenance Organization may by contract agree with a 24group or other enrollment unit to effect refunds or charge 25additional premiums under the following terms and conditions:26        (i) the amount of, and other terms and conditions with   HB3561- 20 -LRB104 10745 BAB 20824 b1    respect to, the refund or additional premium are set forth 2    in the group or enrollment unit contract agreed in advance 3    of the period for which a refund is to be paid or 4    additional premium is to be charged (which period shall 5    not be less than one year); and6        (ii) the amount of the refund or additional premium 7    shall not exceed 20% of the Health Maintenance 8    Organization's profitable or unprofitable experience with 9    respect to the group or other enrollment unit for the 10    period (and, for purposes of a refund or additional 11    premium, the profitable or unprofitable experience shall 12    be calculated taking into account a pro rata share of the 13    Health Maintenance Organization's administrative and 14    marketing expenses, but shall not include any refund to be 15    made or additional premium to be paid pursuant to this 16    subsection (f)). The Health Maintenance Organization and 17    the group or enrollment unit may agree that the profitable 18    or unprofitable experience may be calculated taking into 19    account the refund period and the immediately preceding 2 20    plan years.21    The Health Maintenance Organization shall include a 22statement in the evidence of coverage issued to each enrollee 23describing the possibility of a refund or additional premium, 24and upon request of any group or enrollment unit, provide to 25the group or enrollment unit a description of the method used 26to calculate (1) the Health Maintenance Organization's   HB3561- 21 -LRB104 10745 BAB 20824 b1profitable experience with respect to the group or enrollment 2unit and the resulting refund to the group or enrollment unit 3or (2) the Health Maintenance Organization's unprofitable 4experience with respect to the group or enrollment unit and 5the resulting additional premium to be paid by the group or 6enrollment unit.7    In no event shall the Illinois Health Maintenance 8Organization Guaranty Association be liable to pay any 9contractual obligation of an insolvent organization to pay any 10refund authorized under this Section.11    (g) Rulemaking authority to implement Public Act 95-1045, 12if any, is conditioned on the rules being adopted in 13accordance with all provisions of the Illinois Administrative 14Procedure Act and all rules and procedures of the Joint 15Committee on Administrative Rules; any purported rule not so 16adopted, for whatever reason, is unauthorized. 17(Source: P.A. 102-30, eff. 1-1-22; 102-34, eff. 6-25-21; 18102-203, eff. 1-1-22; 102-306, eff. 1-1-22; 102-443, eff. 191-1-22; 102-589, eff. 1-1-22; 102-642, eff. 1-1-22; 102-665, 20eff. 10-8-21; 102-731, eff. 1-1-23; 102-775, eff. 5-13-22; 21102-804, eff. 1-1-23; 102-813, eff. 5-13-22; 102-816, eff. 221-1-23; 102-860, eff. 1-1-23; 102-901, eff. 7-1-22; 102-1093, 23eff. 1-1-23; 102-1117, eff. 1-13-23; 103-84, eff. 1-1-24; 24103-91, eff. 1-1-24; 103-123, eff. 1-1-24; 103-154, eff. 256-30-23; 103-420, eff. 1-1-24; 103-426, eff. 8-4-23; 103-445, 26eff. 1-1-24; 103-551, eff. 8-11-23; 103-605, eff. 7-1-24;   HB3561- 22 -LRB104 10745 BAB 20824 b1103-618, eff. 1-1-25; 103-649, eff. 1-1-25; 103-656, eff. 21-1-25; 103-700, eff. 1-1-25; 103-718, eff. 7-19-24; 103-751, 3eff. 8-2-24; 103-753, eff. 8-2-24; 103-758, eff. 1-1-25; 4103-777, eff. 8-2-24; 103-808, eff. 1-1-26; 103-914, eff. 51-1-25; 103-918, eff. 1-1-25; 103-1024, eff. 1-1-25; revised 611-26-24.) 7    Section 30. The Limited Health Service Organization Act is 8amended by changing Section 4003 as follows: 9    (215 ILCS 130/4003)  (from Ch. 73, par. 1504-3)10    Sec. 4003. Illinois Insurance Code provisions. Limited 11health service organizations shall be subject to the 12provisions of Sections 133, 134, 136, 137, 139, 140, 141.1, 13141.2, 141.3, 143, 143.31, 143c, 147, 148, 149, 151, 152, 153, 14154, 154.5, 154.6, 154.7, 154.8, 155.04, 155.37, 155.49, 352c, 15355.2, 355.3, 355b, 355d, 356m, 356q, 356v, 356z.4, 356z.4a, 16356z.10, 356z.21, 356z.22, 356z.25, 356z.26, 356z.29, 356z.32, 17356z.33, 356z.41, 356z.46, 356z.47, 356z.51, 356z.53, 356z.54, 18356z.57, 356z.59, 356z.61, 356z.64, 356z.67, 356z.68, 356z.71, 19356z.73, 356z.74, 356z.75, 356z.80, 364.3, 368a, 401, 401.1, 20402, 403, 403A, 408, 408.2, 409, 412, 444, and 444.1 and 21Articles IIA, VIII 1/2, XII, XII 1/2, XIII, XIII 1/2, XXV, and 22XXVI of the Illinois Insurance Code. Nothing in this Section 23shall require a limited health care plan to cover any service 24that is not a limited health service. For purposes of the   HB3561- 23 -LRB104 10745 BAB 20824 b1Illinois Insurance Code, except for Sections 444 and 444.1 and 2Articles XIII and XIII 1/2, limited health service 3organizations in the following categories are deemed to be 4domestic companies:5        (1) a corporation under the laws of this State; or6        (2) a corporation organized under the laws of another 7    state, 30% or more of the enrollees of which are residents 8    of this State, except a corporation subject to 9    substantially the same requirements in its state of 10    organization as is a domestic company under Article VIII 11    1/2 of the Illinois Insurance Code.12(Source: P.A. 102-30, eff. 1-1-22; 102-203, eff. 1-1-22; 13102-306, eff. 1-1-22; 102-642, eff. 1-1-22; 102-731, eff. 141-1-23; 102-775, eff. 5-13-22; 102-813, eff. 5-13-22; 102-816, 15eff. 1-1-23; 102-860, eff. 1-1-23; 102-1093, eff. 1-1-23; 16102-1117, eff. 1-13-23; 103-84, eff. 1-1-24; 103-91, eff. 171-1-24; 103-420, eff. 1-1-24; 103-426, eff. 8-4-23; 103-445, 18eff. 1-1-24; 103-605, eff. 7-1-24; 103-649, eff. 1-1-25; 19103-656, eff. 1-1-25; 103-700, eff. 1-1-25; 103-718, eff. 207-19-24; 103-751, eff. 8-2-24; 103-758, eff. 1-1-25; 103-832, 21eff. 1-1-25; 103-1024, eff. 1-1-25; revised 11-26-24.) 22    Section 35. The Voluntary Health Services Plans Act is 23amended by changing Section 10 as follows: 24    (215 ILCS 165/10)  (from Ch. 32, par. 604)  HB3561- 24 -LRB104 10745 BAB 20824 b1    Sec. 10. Application of Insurance Code provisions. Health 2services plan corporations and all persons interested therein 3or dealing therewith shall be subject to the provisions of 4Articles IIA and XII 1/2 and Sections 3.1, 133, 136, 139, 140, 5143, 143.31, 143c, 149, 155.22a, 155.37, 354, 355.2, 355.3, 6355b, 355d, 356g, 356g.5, 356g.5-1, 356m, 356q, 356r, 356t, 7356u, 356u.10, 356v, 356w, 356x, 356y, 356z.1, 356z.2, 8356z.3a, 356z.4, 356z.4a, 356z.5, 356z.6, 356z.8, 356z.9, 9356z.10, 356z.11, 356z.12, 356z.13, 356z.14, 356z.15, 356z.18, 10356z.19, 356z.21, 356z.22, 356z.25, 356z.26, 356z.29, 356z.30, 11356z.32, 356z.32a, 356z.33, 356z.40, 356z.41, 356z.46, 12356z.47, 356z.51, 356z.53, 356z.54, 356z.56, 356z.57, 356z.59, 13356z.60, 356z.61, 356z.62, 356z.64, 356z.67, 356z.68, 356z.71, 14356z.72, 356z.74, 356z.75, 356z.77, 356z.80, 364.01, 364.3, 15367.2, 368a, 401, 401.1, 402, 403, 403A, 408, 408.2, and 412, 16and paragraphs (7) and (15) of Section 367 of the Illinois 17Insurance Code.18    Rulemaking authority to implement Public Act 95-1045, if 19any, is conditioned on the rules being adopted in accordance 20with all provisions of the Illinois Administrative Procedure 21Act and all rules and procedures of the Joint Committee on 22Administrative Rules; any purported rule not so adopted, for 23whatever reason, is unauthorized. 24(Source: P.A. 102-30, eff. 1-1-22; 102-203, eff. 1-1-22; 25102-306, eff. 1-1-22; 102-642, eff. 1-1-22; 102-665, eff. 2610-8-21; 102-731, eff. 1-1-23; 102-775, eff. 5-13-22; 102-804,   HB3561- 25 -LRB104 10745 BAB 20824 b1eff. 1-1-23; 102-813, eff. 5-13-22; 102-816, eff. 1-1-23; 2102-860, eff. 1-1-23; 102-901, eff. 7-1-22; 102-1093, eff. 31-1-23; 102-1117, eff. 1-13-23; 103-84, eff. 1-1-24; 103-91, 4eff. 1-1-24; 103-420, eff. 1-1-24; 103-445, eff. 1-1-24; 5103-551, eff. 8-11-23; 103-605, eff. 7-1-24; 103-656, eff. 61-1-25; 103-718, eff. 7-19-24; 103-751, eff. 8-2-24; 103-753, 7eff. 8-2-24; 103-758, eff. 1-1-25; 103-832, eff. 1-1-25; 8103-914, eff. 1-1-25; 103-918, eff. 1-1-25; 103-1024, eff. 91-1-25; revised 11-26-24.) 10    Section 40. The Illinois Public Aid Code is amended by 11changing Section 5-16.8 as follows: 12    (305 ILCS 5/5-16.8)13    Sec. 5-16.8. Required health benefits. The medical 14assistance program shall (i) provide the post-mastectomy care 15benefits required to be covered by a policy of accident and 16health insurance under Section 356t and the coverage required 17under Sections 356g.5, 356q, 356u, 356w, 356x, 356z.6, 18356z.26, 356z.29, 356z.32, 356z.33, 356z.34, 356z.35, 356z.46, 19356z.47, 356z.51, 356z.53, 356z.59, 356z.60, 356z.61, 356z.64, 20and 356z.67, and 356z.71, 356z.75, and 356z.80 of the Illinois 21Insurance Code, (ii) be subject to the provisions of Sections 22356z.19, 356z.44, 356z.49, 364.01, 370c, and 370c.1 of the 23Illinois Insurance Code, and (iii) be subject to the 24provisions of subsection (d-5) of Section 10 of the Network   HB3561- 26 -LRB104 10745 BAB 20824 b1Adequacy and Transparency Act.2    The Department, by rule, shall adopt a model similar to 3the requirements of Section 356z.39 of the Illinois Insurance 4Code. 5    On and after July 1, 2012, the Department shall reduce any 6rate of reimbursement for services or other payments or alter 7any methodologies authorized by this Code to reduce any rate 8of reimbursement for services or other payments in accordance 9with Section 5-5e. 10    To ensure full access to the benefits set forth in this 11Section, on and after January 1, 2016, the Department shall 12ensure that provider and hospital reimbursement for 13post-mastectomy care benefits required under this Section are 14no lower than the Medicare reimbursement rate. 15(Source: P.A. 102-30, eff. 1-1-22; 102-144, eff. 1-1-22; 16102-203, eff. 1-1-22; 102-306, eff. 1-1-22; 102-530, eff. 171-1-22; 102-642, eff. 1-1-22; 102-804, eff. 1-1-23; 102-813, 18eff. 5-13-22; 102-816, eff. 1-1-23; 102-1093, eff. 1-1-23; 19102-1117, eff. 1-13-23; 103-84, eff. 1-1-24; 103-91, eff. 201-1-24; 103-420, eff. 1-1-24; 103-605, eff. 7-1-24; 103-703, 21eff. 1-1-25; 103-758, eff. 1-1-25; 103-1024, eff. 1-1-25; 22revised 11-26-24.) 23    Section 95. No acceleration or delay. Where this Act makes 24changes in a statute that is represented in this Act by text 25that is not yet or no longer in effect (for example, a Section   HB3561- 27 -LRB104 10745 BAB 20824 b1represented by multiple versions), the use of that text does 2not accelerate or delay the taking effect of (i) the changes 3made by this Act or (ii) provisions derived from any other 4Public Act.  HB3561- 28 -LRB104 10745 BAB 20824 b1 INDEX 2 Statutes amended in order of appearance 3    5 ILCS 375/6.114    55 ILCS 5/5-1069.35    65 ILCS 5/10-4-2.36    105 ILCS 5/10-22.3f7    5 ILCS 375/356z.80 new8    215 ILCS 125/5-3from Ch. 111 1/2, par. 1411.29    215 ILCS 130/4003from Ch. 73, par. 1504-310    215 ILCS 165/10from Ch. 32, par. 60411    305 ILCS 5/5-16.8